New Jersey, session 222, A3100.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Secretary of State, in conjunction with the commissioner of registration, county clerk, and county board of elections in each county, shall implement a pilot program to allow each person who meets the voter eligibility criteria under R.S.19:31-5 to register to vote on the day of the general election in 2021, 2022, and 2023 at designated locations, as further provided by this section. b.    Under the pilot program, the commissioner of registration, county clerk, and county board of elections in each county shall collectively designate one or more locations in each county to allow for same-day voter registration for all eligible residents of that county who desire to register to vote. At least one location shall be designated in each county in 2021. The commissioner, clerk, and board shall have discretion to open additional locations allowing same-day voter registration in 2022 and 2023. c.     A voter who registers to vote under the same-day voter registration pilot program shall be required to do so in compliance with the eligibility criteria specified under R.S.19:31-5, and shall complete a voter registration form as required under section 16 of P.L.1974, c.30 (C.19:31-6.4). Upon registering to vote, a voter shall be directed to the voters designated polling place and shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot. d.    The Secretary of State, in collaboration with the commissioner of registration, county clerk, and county board of elections in each county, shall develop interim reports on the effectiveness of the pilot program, including an audit of the pilot program, for each of the 2021, 2022, and 2023 implementation years by January 31 of the following year, along with a final report by March 1, 2024. The interim and final reports shall be submitted to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, by January 31 of 2022, 2023, and 2024, and March 1, 2024, respectively. e.     If the Secretary of State, commissioner of registration, county clerk, and county board of elections in each county find in their final report required pursuant to subsection d. of this section that the pilot program was successful in increasing voter registration and participation in the elections relative to comparable general elections, with a low risk for voter fraud, then the final report shall include recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature for the enactment of same-day voter registration in this State at every polling location for the 2024 general election, and all elections thereafter. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately, and shall expire on March 1, 2024, or upon the issuance of the final report required by this act, whichever occurs later.